Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 2
DOMESTIC WATERWORKS DISTRICT:
UNINCORPORATED TERRITORY
(1913 ACT)

32-4-201 to 32-4-231. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part repealed, p. 1628, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was numbered as article 1 of chapter 89, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 1981, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.